Utah statutes.
53A-1-402.6.   Core curriculum.

(1)  In establishing minimum standards related to curriculum and instruction requirements under Section 53A-1-402, the State Board of Education shall, in consultation with local school boards, school superintendents, teachers, employers, and parents implement a core curriculum which will enable students to, among other objectives:

(a)  communicate effectively, both verbally and through written communication;

(b)  apply mathematics; and

(c)  access, analyze, and apply information.

(2)  The board shall:

(a) identify the basic knowledge, skills, and competencies each student is expected to acquire or master as the student advances through the public education system; and

(b)  align the core curriculum and tests administered under the Utah Performance Assessment System for Students (U-PASS) with each other.

(3)  The basic knowledge, skills, and competencies identified pursuant to Subsection (2)(a) shall increase in depth and complexity from year to year and focus on consistent and continual progress within and between grade levels and courses in the core academic areas of:

(a)  English, including explicit phonics, spelling, grammar, reading, writing, vocabulary, speech, and listening; and

(b)  mathematics, including basic computational skills.

(4)  Local school boards shall design their school programs, that are supported by generally accepted scientific standards of evidence, to focus on the core curriculum with the expectation that each program will enhance or help achieve mastery of the core curriculum.

(5)  Except as provided in Section 53A-13-101, each school may select instructional materials and methods of teaching, that are supported by generally accepted scientific standards of evidence, that it considers most appropriate to meet core curriculum objectives.

